South Dakota, session 2026, HB1316.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 12-20-36 be AMENDED:
12-20-36. Within six calendar days after the close of any election, the officer The
person in charge of the election, with the assistance of a majority of the governing board
as the canvassing board, shall make the canvass of votes at nine a.m. local time on the
first Tuesday following the election. Each member of the governing board may name and
have on file with the officer in charge of the election a person to represent the member at
the official canvass in the event of the member's absence for cause.
The person in charge of the election shall post the time and place of the canvass
to the secretary of state's website.
Section 2. That § 12-20-47 be AMENDED:
12-20-47. Within seven days after the day of election, the The Board of State
Canvassers shall open and examine the returns from each county. However, if at nine
a.m. central time on the second Tuesday following the election. If the returns from each
county have not been received, the board may adjourn, not exceeding for a period of
time not to exceed ten days, for the purpose of obtaining the returns from each county.
The board shall proceed with the canvass after the returns have been received from each
county.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.